North Dakota, session 69, HB1516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
School board - Observer.
1. The board of a school district must include one to two board observers who are
educational employees employed by the school district to represent educational
employees.
2. A board observer:
a. Shall represent the interests of educational employees of the school district at
each meeting of the board of a school.
b. Must be appointed to a one-year term by the education association in the school
district by vote of the education association at a meeting held before the
beginning of each fiscal year.
c. May participate in a meeting of the board of a school district, except as otherwise
provided under this section, including participating in discussion to contribute the
perspectives of the educational employees.
d. Is not a voting board member.
e. May not participate in a meeting or part of a meeting regarding employment
matters specifically related to the observer.
f. Shall provide a summary to the education association of each meeting, including
details that are relevant to educational employees.
Page No. 1 25.0925.02000